North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 20. Absentee Ballot.
§ 163-234.
Counting absentee ballots by county board of elections.

All absentee ballots returned to the county board of elections in the container-return envelopes shall be retained by the board to be counted by the county board of elections as follows:

Only those absentee ballots returned to the county board of elections no later than 5:00 p.m. on the day before election day in a properly executed container-return envelope or absentee ballots received pursuant to G.S. 163-231(b)(2)b. or c. shall be
counted, except to the extent federal law requires otherwise.

The county board of elections shall meet at 5:00 p.m. on election day in the board office or other public location in the county courthouse for the purpose of counting all absentee ballots except those which have been challenged before 5:00 p.m. on election
day and those received pursuant to G.S. 163-231(b)(2)b. or c. Any elector of the county shall be permitted to attend the meeting and allowed to observe the counting process, so long as the elector does not in any manner interfere
with the election officials in the discharge of their duties.

The county board of elections may begin counting absentee ballots issued under Article 21A of this Chapter between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. and may begin counting all absentee ballots between the hours of 2:00 p.m. and 5:00 p.m. upon the adoption
of a resolution at least two weeks prior to the election in which the hour and place of counting absentee ballots shall be stated. The resolution also may provide for an additional meeting following the day of the election
and prior to the day of canvass to count absentee ballots received pursuant to G.S. 163-231(b)(2)b. or c. as provided in subdivision (11) of this section. A copy of the resolution shall be published once a week for two weeks
prior to the election, in a newspaper having general circulation in the county. Notice may additionally be made on a radio or television station or both, but the notice shall be in addition to the newspaper and other required
notice. The count shall be continuous until completed and the members shall not separate or leave the counting place except for unavoidable necessity, except that if the count has been completed prior to the time the polls
close, it shall be suspended until that time pending receipt of any additional ballots. Nothing in this section prohibits a county board of elections from taking preparatory steps for the count earlier than the times specified
in this section, as long as the preparatory steps do not reveal to any individual not engaged in the actual count election results before the times specified in this subdivision for the count to begin. By way of illustration
and not limitation, a preparatory step for the count would be the entry of tally cards from direct record electronic voting units into a computer for processing. The board shall not announce the result of the count before 7:30
p.m.

Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this section, a county board of elections may, at each meeting at which it approves absentee ballot applications pursuant to G.S. 163-230.1(e) and (f), remove those ballots from their envelopes and have them read by
an optical scanning machine, without printing the totals on the scanner. The board shall complete the counting of these ballots at the times provided in subdivision (2) of this section. The State Board of Elections shall provide
instructions to county boards of elections for executing this procedure, and the instructions shall be designed to ensure the accuracy of the count, the participation of board members of both parties, and the secrecy of the results
before election day. This subdivision applies only in counties that use optical scan devices to count absentee ballots.

The counting of absentee ballots shall not commence until a majority and at least one board member of each political party represented on the board is present and that fact is publicly declared and entered in the official minutes of the county board.

The county board of elections may employ such assistants as deemed necessary to count the absentee ballots, but each board member present shall be responsible for and observe and supervise the opening and tallying of the ballots.

As each ballot envelope is opened, the board shall cause to be entered into a pollbook designated “Pollbook of Absentee Voters” the name of the absentee voter, or if the pollbook is computer-generated, the board shall check off the name. Preserving secrecy,
the ballots shall be placed in the appropriate ballot boxes, at least one of which shall be provided for each type of ballot. The “Pollbook of Absentee Voters” shall also contain the names of all persons who voted under

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6, but those names may be printed by computer for inclusion in the pollbook.After all ballots have been placed in the boxes, the counting process shall begin.If one-stop ballots under

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6 are counted electronically, that count shall commence at the time the polls close. If one-stop ballots are paper ballots counted manually, that count shall commence at the same time as
other absentee ballots are counted.If a challenge transmitted to the board on canvass day by a chief judge is sustained, the ballots challenged and sustained shall be withdrawn from the appropriate boxes, as provided in G.S. 163-89(e).As
soon as the absentee ballots have been counted and the names of the absentee voters entered in the pollbook as required in this subdivision, the board members and assistants employed to count the absentee ballots shall each sign
the pollbook immediately beneath the last absentee voter’s name entered in the pollbook. The county board of elections is responsible for the safekeeping of the pollbook of absentee voters.

Upon completion of the counting process the board members shall cause the results of the tally to be entered on the absentee abstract prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The abstract shall be signed by the members of the board in attendance and
the original mailed immediately to the State Board of Elections. The county board of elections may have a separate count on the abstract for one-stop absentee ballots under

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6.

One copy of the absentee abstract shall be retained by the county board of elections and the totals appearing on the absentee abstract shall be added to the final totals of all votes cast in the county for each office as determined on the official canvass.

In the event a political party does not have a member of the county board of elections present at the meeting to count absentee ballots due to illness or other cause of the member, the counting shall not commence until the county party chairman of the
absent member, or a member of the party’s county executive committee, is in attendance. The person shall act as an official witness to the counting and shall sign the absentee ballot abstract as an “observer”.

The county board of elections shall retain all container-return envelopes and absentee ballots, in a safe place, for at least four months, and longer if any contest is pending concerning the validity of any ballot.

The county board of elections shall meet after election day and prior to the date of canvass to determine whether the container-return envelopes for absentee ballots received pursuant to G.S. 163-231(b)(2)b. or c. have been properly executed. The county
board of elections shall comply with the requirements of

G.S. 163-230.1

for approval of applications. Any absentee ballots received pursuant to G.S. 163-231(b)(2)b. or c. shall be counted by the county board of elections on the day of canvass. The county board of elections may also meet
following the day of the election and prior to the day of canvass to count absentee ballots received pursuant to G.S. 163-231(b)(2)b. or c. upon the adoption of a resolution pursuant to subdivision (2) of this section. The county
board of elections shall comply with all other requirements of this section for the counting of these absentee ballots.

History.
1939, c. 159, ss. 8, 9; 1945, c. 758, s. 8; 1953, c. 1114; 1963, c. 547, s. 8; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; c. 851, s. 2; 1973, c. 536, s. 1; 1975, c. 798, s. 3; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; c. 626, s. 1; 1989, c. 93, s. 7; 1993 (Reg. Sess.,
1994), c. 762, s. 55; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1999-455, s. 14; 2005-159, s. 1; 2006-262, s. 1; 2009-537, s. 8(d); 2011-182, s. 7; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.4(k); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2020-69, s. 5.6.

§ 163-235.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 536, s. 5.

§ 163-236.
Violations by county board of elections.

The county board of elections shall be sole custodian of blank applications for absentee ballots, official ballots, and container-return envelopes for absentee ballots. The board shall issue and deliver blank applications for absentee ballots in strict
accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 163-230.1

. The issuance of ballots to persons whose requests for absentee ballots have been received by the county board of elections under the provisions of

G.S. 163-230.1

is the responsibility and duty of the county board of elections.

It shall be the duty of the county board of elections to keep current all records required by this Article and to make promptly all reports required by this Article. If that duty has been assigned to the chair, member, officer, or employee of the board
of elections, that person shall carry out the duty.

The willful violation of this section shall constitute a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.
1939, c. 159, s. 14; 1963, c. 457, s. 10; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; 1987, c. 565, s. 9; 1993, c. 539, s. 1105; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1999-455, s. 15; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-237.
Certain violations of absentee ballot law made criminal offenses.

False Statements under Oath Made Class 1 Misdemeanor. — If any person shall willfully and falsely make any affidavit or statement, under oath, which affidavit or statement under oath, is required to be made by the provisions of this Article, that person
shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

False Statements Not under Oath Made Class 1 Misdemeanor. — Except as provided by G.S. 163-275(16), if any person, for the purpose of obtaining or voting any official ballot under the provisions of this Article, shall willfully sign any printed or written
false statement which does not purport to be under oath, or which, if it purports to be under oath, was not duly sworn to, that person shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Candidate Witnessing Absentee Ballots of Nonrelative Made Class 1 Misdemeanor. — A person is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if that person acts as a witness under G.S. 163-231(a) in any primary or election in which the person is a candidate for nomination
or election, unless the voter is the candidate’s near relative as defined in G.S. 163-226(f).

Fraud in Connection with Absentee Vote; Forgery. — Any person attempting to aid and abet fraud in connection with any absentee vote cast or to be cast, under the provisions of this Article, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Attempting to vote by fraudulently
signing the name of a regularly qualified voter is a Class G felony. (d1) Sell or Attempt to Sell Completed Absentee Ballot. — Any person who sells or attempts to sell, or purchases or agrees to purchase, a completed written request,
a completed application for absentee ballots, or voted absentee ballots, shall be guilty of a Class I felony.

(d2) Destruction of Absentee Ballot. — Any person who intentionally, with the intent of obstructing a vote by a registered voter, fails to deliver or intentionally destroys a completed written request, a completed application for absentee ballots, or
voted absentee ballots, shall be guilty of a Class G felony.

(d3) Copies or Retention of Identifying Information. — Any person, other than the voter or near relative or verifiable legal guardian of that voter, who copies or otherwise retains the request for absentee ballots, a completed application for absentee
ballots, or any identifying information, as defined in

G.S. 14-113.20

, disclosed in a request or application, shall be guilty of a Class G felony.

(d4) Compensation Based on Requests. — Any person who compensates another, or who accepts compensation, based on the number of returned written requests for absentee ballots under

G.S. 163-230.2

, shall be guilty of a Class I felony.

(d5) Intent to Unlawfully Influence. — Any person who commits, attempts to commit, or conspires to commit a crime identified in G.S. 163-82.6(b), 163-226.3(a), 163-274, 163-275, or this section with the intent to unlawfully influence or interfere with
a primary or election, or to otherwise unlawfully gain, shall be guilty of a Class F felony.

(d6) Disclosure of Register of Absentee Ballot Requests. — Notwithstanding G.S. 132-3(a), any person who steals, releases, or possesses the official register of absentee requests for mail-in absentee ballots as provided in

G.S. 163-228

prior to the opening of the voting place in accordance with

G.S. 163-166.01

, for a purpose other than the conduct of business at the county board of elections, shall be guilty of a Class G felony.

(d7) Sending of Unrequested Absentee Ballot. — Any member serving on the State Board or on any county board of elections, or any employee of the State Board or a county board of elections, who knowingly sends or delivers an absentee ballot to any person
who has not requested an absentee ballot in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes shall be guilty of a Class I felony.

Violations Not Otherwise Provided for Made Class 1 Misdemeanors. — If any person shall willfully violate any of the provisions of this Article, or willfully fail to comply with any of the provisions thereof, for which no other punishment is herein provided,
that person shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.
1929, c. 164, s. 40; 1939, c. 159, ss. 12, 13, 15; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1977, c. 469, s. 1, 1985, c. 562, s. 6; 1987, c. 565, s. 8; 1993, c. 539, ss. 1106, 1324; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1999-455, s. 22; 2014-111,
s. 15(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2019-239, s. 1.5(a); 2020-17, s. 8(a).

§ 163-238.
Reports of violations to district attorneys.

It shall be the duty of the State Board of Elections to report to the district attorney of the appropriate prosecutorial district, any violation of this Article, or the failure of any person charged with a duty under its provisions to comply with and
perform that duty, and it shall be the duty of the district attorney to cause such a person to be prosecuted therefor.

History.
1939, c. 159, s. 16; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-239.
Article 21A relating to absentee voting by military and overseas voters not applicable.

Except as otherwise provided therein, Article 21A of this Chapter shall not apply to or modify the provisions of this Article.

History.
1963, c. 457, s. 11; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; 2011-182, s. 8; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 163-240 through 163-240.5.

Expired July 1, 1972.

§§ 163-241 through 163-244.

Reserved for future codification purposes.